Utah statutes.
76-10-528.   Carrying a dangerous weapon while under influence of alcohol or drugs unlawful.

(1)  Any person who carries a dangerous weapon while under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance as defined in Section 58-37-2 is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.  Under the influence means the same level of influence or blood or breath alcohol concentration as provided in Subsections 41-6a-502(1)(a) through(c).

(2)  It is not a defense to prosecution under this section that the person:

(a)  is licensed in the pursuit of wildlife of any kind; or

(b)  has a valid permit to carry a concealed firearm.



Amended by Chapter 226, 2008 General Session

